sl-SI: Standardni navoj verižnika: BMX/levo; Campagnolo N3W; Francoski (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/britanski (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italijanski (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Drugo
nl: Freewheel-schroefdraadstandaard: BMX/linkshandig; Campagnolo N3W; Frans (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Brits (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italiaans (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Overige
tr: Freewheel diş standardı: BMX/sol dişli; Campagnolo N3W; Fransız (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/İngiliz (1,37" x 24 TPI); İtalyan (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Diğer
vi: Tiêu chuẩn ren bánh răng tự do: BMX/Ren trái; Campagnolo N3W; Hệ Pháp (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); Hệ ISO/Anh (1.37" x 24 TPI); Hệ Ý (33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Khác
el: Πρότυπο σπειρώματος ελεύθερου γραναζιού: BMX/αριστερόστροφο; Campagnolo N3W; Γαλλικό (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Βρετανικό (1,37" x 24 TPI); Ιταλικό (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Άλλο
es: Estándar de rosca de rueda libre: BMX/rosca izquierda; Campagnolo N3W; Francesa (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/inglesa (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italiana (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Otro
lt-LT: Laisvosios eigos sriegio standartas: BMX / kairė pusė; Campagnolo N3W; Prancūziškas (1,366 col. x 25,4 TPI); ISO / britiškas (1,37 col. x 24 TPI); Itališkas (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Kita
fr: Standard de filetage de la roue libre: BMX/pas à gauche; Campagnolo N3W; Français (1,366 po x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Britannique (1,37 po x 24 TPI); Italien (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Autre
hr-HR: Standardni broj poruke za slobodni hod: BMX / lijevi navoj; Campagnolo N3W; Francuski (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO / britanski (1,37" x 24 TPI); Talijanski (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Ostalo
ja: フリーホイールスレッド標準: BMX/左用; Campagnolo N3W; フレンチ (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/ブリティッシュ (1.37" x 24 TPI); イタリアン (33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; その他
hu: Szabadonfutó menet szabvány: BMX / Balmenetes; Campagnolo N3W; Francia (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO / Brit (1,37" x 24 TPI); Olasz (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Egyéb
nb: Friløpstråd standard: BMX / venstregjenget; Campagnolo N3W; Fransk (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/britisk (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italiensk (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Annet
fi: Vapaarattaan kierteen standardi: BMX / vasenkätinen; Campagnolo N3W; Ranskalainen (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/brittiläinen (1.37" x 24 TPI); Italialainen (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Muu
pt-PT: thread padrão de roda livre: BMX/lado esquerdo; Campagnolo N3W; Francês (1,366 pol. x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Britânico (1,37 pol. x 24 TPI); Italiano (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Outro
it: Standard della filettatura della ruota libera: BMX/sinistrorso; Campagnolo N3W; Francese (1,366” x 25,4 TPI); ISO/inglese (1,37” x 24 TPI); Italiano (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Altro
ru: Резьбовой стандарт трещотки: BMX / левая резьба; Campagnolo N3W; Французский стандарт (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO / британский стандарт (1,37" x 24 TPI); Итальянский стандарт (33,6 мм x 1 мм); M30 x 1 мм; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Другое
cs: Standard závitu volnoběžky: BMX/levotočivý; Campagnolo N3W; Francouzský (1,366" × 25,4 TPI); ISO/britský (1,37" × 24 TPI); Italský (33,6 mm × 1 mm); M30 × 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Jiné
ko: 프리휠 나사산 규격: BMX/좌나사; 캄파놀로 N3W; 프렌치(1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/영국식(1.37" x 24 TPI); 이탈리아식(33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; 스램 XD; 스램 XDR; 시마노 HG; 기타
sv: Gängstandard för frihjul: BMX/vänstergängad; Campagnolo N3W; Fransk (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/brittisk (1.37" x 24 TPI); Italiensk (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Övrigt
en: Freewheel thread standard: BMX/Left-hand; Campagnolo N3W; French (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/British (1.37" x 24 TPI); Italian (33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Other
de: Freilaufgewindestandard: BMX/Linksgewinde; Campagnolo N3W; Französisch (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Britisch (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italienisch (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 飛輪螺紋標準: BMX/左手牙; Campagnolo N3W; 法式 (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/英式 (1.37" x 24 TPI); 義式 (33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; 其他
ro-RO: Standardul filetului roții libere: BMX/pe stânga; Campagnolo N3W; Francez (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/britanic (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italian (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Altele
da: Standard for friløbsgevind: BMX/venstregevind; Campagnolo N3W; Fransk (1.366" x 25.4 TPI); ISO/britisk (1.37" x 24 TPI); Italiensk (33.6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Andet
pt-BR: Padrão de rosca da catraca: BMX/Rosca esquerda; Campagnolo N3W; Francês (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Britânico (1,37" x 24 TPI); Italiano (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Outro
pl: Standard gwintu wolnobiegu: BMX / lewostronny; Campagnolo N3W; Francuski (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO / brytyjski (1,37" x 24 TPI); Włoski (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Inny
th: มาตราฐานร่องยางของ Freewheel: BMX/เกลียวซ้าย; Campagnolo N3W; ฝรั่งเศส (1.366 นิ้ว x 25.4 TPI); ISO/อังกฤษ (1.37 นิ้ว x 24 TPI); อิตาลี (33.6 มม. x 1 มม.); M30 x 1 มม.; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Norma závitu pre voľnobežku: BMX/ľavotočivý; Campagnolo N3W; Francúzsky (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/britský (1,37" x 24 TPI); Taliansky (33,6 mm x 1 mm); M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Iné
bg-BG: Стандарт на резбата за свободен венец: BMX/Лява резба; Campagnolo N3W; Френска (1,366" x 25,4 TPI); ISO/Британска (1,37" x 24 TPI); Италианска (33,6 мм x 1 мм); M30 x 1 мм; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Друго
zh-CN: 飞轮螺纹标准: BMX/左侧; Campagnolo N3W; 法式（1.366" x 25.4 TPI）; ISO/英式（1.37" x 24 TPI）; 意式（33.6 mm x 1 mm）; M30 x 1 mm; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; 其他